Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 1
COMPETITION IN UTILITY
AND ENTERTAINMENT SERVICES

29-27-101. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that it is the policy of this state to ensure that cable television service, telecommunications service, and high speed internet access, otherwise known as advanced service, are each provided within a consistent, comprehensive, and nondiscriminatory federal, state, and local government framework.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

There is a need for statewide uniformity in the regulation of all public and private entities that provide cable television service, telecommunications service, and advanced service.

Municipal ordinances, rules, and other regulations governing the provision of cable television service, telecommunications service, and advanced service by a local government impact persons living outside the municipality.

Regulating the provision of cable television service, telecommunications service, and advanced service by a local government is a matter of statewide concern.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1280, § 1, effective June 3.

29-27-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Advanced service" means high-speed internet access capability in excess of two hundred fifty-six kilobits per second both upstream and downstream.

"Cable television service" means the one-way transmission to subscribers of video programming or other programming service, as well as subscriber interaction, if any, that is required for the selection or use of the video programming or other programming service.

"Local government" means any city, county, city and county, special district, or other political subdivision of this state.

"Private provider" means a private entity that provides cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service.

"Subscriber" means a person that lawfully receives cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service. A person that utilizes cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service provided by a local government for local governmental or intergovernmental purposes and is used by persons accessing government services is not a subscriber for purposes of this article.

"Telecommunications service" has the same meaning as set forth in section 40-15-102 (29), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1281, § 1, effective June 3.

29-27-103. Limitations on providing cable television, telecommunications, and advanced services.

Except as provided in this article, a local government shall not:

Provide to one or more subscribers cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service; or

Purchase, lease, construct, maintain, or operate any facility for the purpose of providing cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service to one or more subscribers.

For purposes of this article, a local government provides cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service if the local government provides the cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service to one or more subscribers:

Directly;

Indirectly by means that include but are not limited to the following:

Through an authority or instrumentality acting on behalf of the local government or for the benefit of the local government by itself;

Through a partnership or joint venture;

Through a sale and leaseback arrangement;

By contract, including a contract whereby the local government leases, sells capacity in, or grants other similar rights to a private provider to use local governmental facilities designed or constructed to provide cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service for internal local government purposes in connection with a private provider's offering of cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service; or

Through sale or purchase of resale or wholesale cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service for the purpose of providing cable television service, telecommunications service, or advanced service to one or more subscribers.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the authority of a local government to lease to a private provider physical space in or on its property for the placement of equipment or facilities the private provider uses to provide cable television, telecommunications, or advanced services.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article added, p. 1281, § 1, effective June 3.